Colorado, session 2026A, SB069.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add article 106.5 to
title 22 as follows:
ARTICLE 106.5
Colorado Domestic Exchange Program
22-106.5-101. Short title.
THE SHORT TITLE OF THIS ARTICLE 106.5 IS THE "COLORADO
DOMESTIC EXCHANGE PROGRAM ACT" OR "CODE ACT".
22-106.5-102. Legislative declaration.
(1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(a) MANY YOUNG PEOPLE GRADUATE FROM HIGH SCHOOL WITHOUT
MEANINGFUL RELATIONSHIPS WITH PEERS FROM DIFFERENT COMMUNITIES;
(b) YOUNG PEOPLE WHO FEEL DISCONNECTED ARE MORE
VULNERABLE TO POLARIZATION, MISINFORMATION, AND DISTRUST;
(c) STUDENTS WHO TRAVEL TO CULTURALLY, POLITICALLY, AND
SOCIOECONOMICALLY DIFFERENT COMMUNITIES OFTEN GAIN GREATER
EMPATHY, UNDERSTANDING, AND APPRECIATION FOR DIVERSITY;
(d) STUDENTS WITH FEWER ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL RESOURCES
ARE LESS LIKELY TO HAVE THE OPPORTUNITY TO TRAVEL OUTSIDE THEIR
HOME COMMUNITIES;
(e) HIGH SCHOOL DOMESTIC EXCHANGE PROGRAMS INCREASE
EMPATHY, BELONGING, OPTIMISM, AND CIVIC CURIOSITY IN PARTICIPATING
STUDENTS; AND
-2- SB26-069

(f) INVITING STUDENTS FROM OTHER STATES TO COLORADO
THROUGH A HIGH SCHOOL DOMESTIC EXCHANGE PROGRAM MAY ATTRACT
MORE STUDENTS TO PURSUE POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION OR CAREER
OPPORTUNITIES IN COLORADO.
22-106.5-103. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS ARTICLE 106.5, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) "COORDINATING ENTITY" MEANS THE ENTITY UNDER
CONTRACT WITH THE DEPARTMENT TO COORDINATE THE NATIONAL
DOMESTIC EXCHANGE FOR STUDENTS, AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION
22-106.5-104 (2).
(2) "DEPARTMENT" MEANS THE COLORADO DEPARTMENT OF
EDUCATION.
(3) "FUND" MEANS THE COLORADO DOMESTIC EXCHANGE
PROGRAM CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION 22-106.5-106.
(4) "PROGRAM" MEANS THE COLORADO DOMESTIC EXCHANGE
PROGRAM CREATED IN SECTION 22-106.5-104.
22-106.5-104. Colorado domestic exchange program - creation
- coordinating entity - purpose.
(1) THE COLORADO DOMESTIC EXCHANGE PROGRAM IS CREATED
IN THE DEPARTMENT. THE PROGRAM ENABLES GRADUATES OF A HIGH
SCHOOL IN COLORADO, IN THE SUMMER FOLLOWING THEIR HIGH SCHOOL
GRADUATION, TO STAY IN ANOTHER STATE FOR A WEEK AND ASSIST IN
HOSTING A GROUP OF STUDENTS FROM ANOTHER STATE IN THE
GRADUATES' HOMETOWN FOR A WEEK. STUDENTS PARTICIPATING IN THE
PROGRAM DO NOT HAVE TO PAY FOR THEIR MEALS, FLIGHTS, ACTIVITIES,
LODGING, OR TRANSPORTATION. THE TWO-WEEK PROGRAM OFFERS
-3- SB26-069

EXPERIENCES THAT ALLOW STUDENTS TO EXPLORE SIMILARITIES AND
DIFFERENCES IN THE POLITICAL, SOCIOECONOMIC, AND CULTURAL
FEATURES OF THEIR PLACE OF RESIDENCE AND THE LOCATION OF THE
EXCHANGE.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ENTER INTO A CONTRACT WITH, AND
DISTRIBUTE MONEY FROM THE COLORADO DOMESTIC EXCHANGE PROGRAM
CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION 22-106.5-106 TO, A PUBLIC OR PRIVATE
ENTITY WITH EXPERIENCE OPERATING NATIONAL DOMESTIC YOUTH
EXCHANGES TO COORDINATE THE NATIONAL DOMESTIC EXCHANGE FOR
STUDENTS IN COLORADO.
22-106.5-105. Colorado domestic exchange program - state
board of education - coordinating entity - duties - repeal.
(1) THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION SHALL PROVIDE OVERSIGHT
OF THE PROGRAM AND SHALL:
(a) MONITOR THE USE OF THE MONEY DISTRIBUTED BY THE
DEPARTMENT TO THE COORDINATING ENTITY PURSUANT TO SECTION
22-106.5-104 (2) TO ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH THIS ARTICLE 106.5 AND
APPLICABLE PROGRAM REQUIREMENTS;
(b) RECEIVE AND REVIEW REPORTS SUBMITTED BY THE
COORDINATING ENTITY AS REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3) OF
THIS SECTION; AND
(c) PROVIDE GUIDANCE OR RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE
COORDINATING ENTITY, AS APPROPRIATE, TO SUPPORT THE EFFECTIVE AND
RESPONSIBLE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE PROGRAM.
(2) THE COORDINATING ENTITY SHALL:
(a) DESIGN, ADMINISTER, AND MANAGE PROGRAM OPERATIONS;
(b) RECRUIT, SELECT, AND SUPPORT STUDENTS PARTICIPATING IN
-4- SB26-069

THE PROGRAM, INCLUDING ENSURING THAT STUDENTS REPRESENT A
DIVERSITY OF SCHOOLS AND SCHOOL DISTRICTS ACROSS THE STATE;
(c) RECRUIT, SELECT, AND SUPPORT EDUCATORS OR OTHER
PROGRAM STAFF WHO SERVE IN COORDINATION OR SUPPORT ROLES FOR
PARTICIPATING STUDENTS;
(d) MANAGE AND DISTRIBUTE PROGRAM FUNDS, INCLUDING FUNDS
USED FOR PARTICIPANT TRAVEL, MEALS, LODGING, ACTIVITIES, AND OTHER
PROGRAMMATIC COSTS;
(e) ESTABLISH AND MAINTAIN POLICIES AND PROCEDURES TO
ENSURE PARTICIPANT SAFETY, PROGRAM QUALITY, AND RESPONSIBLE USE
OF FUNDS; AND
(f) CARRY OUT ANY OTHER DUTIES NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT THE
PROGRAM IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS ARTICLE 106.5.
(3) BEGINNING IN THE FIRST JANUARY AFTER THIS SECTION
BECOMES EFFECTIVE, AND IN JANUARY OF EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
COORDINATING ENTITY SHALL PREPARE AND SUBMIT TO THE STATE BOARD
OF EDUCATION INFORMATION NECESSARY FOR THE DEPARTMENT TO
INCLUDE, AS PART OF ITS PRESENTATION DURING THE "SMART ACT"
HEARING REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SECTION 2-7-203, INFORMATION
CONCERNING THE NUMBER OF STUDENTS, SCHOOL DISTRICTS, AND
SCHOOLS PARTICIPATING IN THE PROGRAM.
(4) (a) THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION, IN COORDINATION WITH
THE COORDINATING ENTITY, SHALL START DISTRIBUTING MONEY
BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, TO FACILITATE STUDENT PARTICIPATION IN THE
PROGRAM IN THE 2027-28 STATE FISCAL YEAR.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (4) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JUNE 30, 2029.
22-106.5-106. Colorado domestic exchange program cash fund
-5- SB26-069

created - gifts, grants, and donations.
(1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY SEEK, ACCEPT, AND EXPEND GIFTS,
GRANTS, OR DONATIONS FROM PRIVATE OR PUBLIC SOURCES FOR THE
PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE 106.5. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL TRANSMIT ALL
MONEY RECEIVED THROUGH GIFTS, GRANTS, OR DONATIONS TO THE STATE
TREASURER, WHO SHALL CREDIT THE MONEY TO THE COLORADO DOMESTIC
EXCHANGE PROGRAM CASH FUND.
(2) THE COLORADO DOMESTIC EXCHANGE PROGRAM CASH FUND
IS CREATED IN THE STATE TREASURY. THE FUND CONSISTS OF GIFTS,
GRANTS, AND DONATIONS CREDITED TO THE FUND PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION AND ANY OTHER MONEY THAT THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY APPROPRIATE OR TRANSFER TO THE FUND.
(3) MONEY IN THE FUND IS CONTINUOUSLY APPROPRIATED TO THE
DEPARTMENT FOR PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE 106.5.
(4) THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION AND THE DEPARTMENT MAY
SEEK, ACCEPT, AND EXPEND GIFTS, GRANTS, OR DONATIONS FROM PRIVATE
OR PUBLIC SOURCES FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION.
(5) IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 24-36-114 (1), THE STATE
TREASURER SHALL CREDIT ALL INTEREST AND INCOME DERIVED FROM THE
DEPOSIT AND INVESTMENT OF MONEY IN THE FUND TO THE FUND.
(6) THE DEPARTMENT IS NOT REQUIRED TO IMPLEMENT THE
PROGRAM IN ANY FISCAL YEAR UNLESS SUFFICIENT FUNDS ARE AVAILABLE
FOR THAT PURPOSE. IF SUFFICIENT FUNDS ARE NOT AVAILABLE, THE
DEPARTMENT MAY IMPLEMENT THE PROGRAM ONLY IF THE COORDINATING
ENTITY DEMONSTRATES THAT ALL OPERATIONAL AND PROGRAMMATIC
COSTS WILL BE COVERED THROUGH PRIVATE GIFTS, GRANTS, DONATIONS,
OR SPONSORSHIP.
-6- SB26-069

(7) (a) IF BY JUNE 30, 2027, THE MONEY IN THE FUND HAS NOT
REACHED OR EXCEEDED FORTY-FIVE THOUSAND DOLLARS, THE STATE
TREASURER SHALL RETURN FROM THE FUND TO THE COORDINATING
ENTITY, THE GRANTOR, OR DONOR THE AMOUNT OF THE COORDINATING
ENTITY'S, GRANTOR'S, OR DONOR'S GIFTS, GRANTS, OR DONATIONS.
(b) IF ANY MONEY REMAINS IN THE FUND AFTER THE STATE
TREASURER RETURNS MONEY TO DONORS OR GRANTORS PURSUANT TO
THIS SUBSECTION (7), AS APPLICABLE, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL,
PRIOR TO THE REPEAL OF THE FUND, TRANSFER ALL UNEXPENDED AND
UNENCUMBERED MONEY IN THE FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
22-106.5-107. Effective dates - notice to revisor of statutes -
repeal of part.
(1) SECTIONS 22-106.5-104 AND 22-106.5-105 WILL TAKE EFFECT,
AND SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION WILL BE REPEALED, IF THE
DEPARTMENT RECEIVES FORTY-FIVE THOUSAND DOLLARS IN GIFTS,
GRANTS, OR DONATIONS FOR PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE 106.5. THE
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION SHALL NOTIFY
THE REVISOR OF STATUTES IN WRITING OF THE DATE WHEN THE CONDITION
SPECIFIED IN THIS SECTION HAS OCCURRED BY EMAILING THE NOTICE TO
REVISOROFSTATUTES.GA@COLEG.GOV. SECTIONS 22-106.5-104 AND
22-106.5-105 TAKE EFFECT, AND SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION IS
REPEALED, UPON THE DATE IDENTIFIED IN THE NOTICE THAT THE
DEPARTMENT RECEIVED FORTY-FIVE THOUSAND DOLLARS IN GIFTS,
GRANTS, OR DONATIONS FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE 106.5 OR, IF
THE NOTICE DOES NOT SPECIFY THAT DATE, UPON THE DATE OF THE NOTICE
TO THE REVISOR OF STATUTES.
(2) (a) SECTIONS 22-106.5-101 TO 22-106.5-105 ARE REPEALED,
-7- SB26-069

EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027; EXCEPT THAT IF THE REVISOR OF STATUTES
RECEIVES NOTICE PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30,
2027, THEN SECTIONS 22-106.5-101 TO 22-106.5-105 ARE NOT REPEALED.
(b) THIS SECTION AND SECTION 22-106.5-107 ARE REPEALED,
EFFECTIVE JUNE 30, 2028; EXCEPT THAT IF THE REVISOR OF STATUTES
RECEIVES NOTICE PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30,
2027, THEN THIS SECTION AND SECTION 22-106.5-106 ARE NOT REPEALED.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-8- SB26-069